Illinois, session 104th, HB2177.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Banking Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 5/1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 301)7    Sec. 1. Title. This Act may be cited as the the Illinois 8Banking Act.9(Source: Laws 1955, p. 83.)